District of Columbia statutes.
8-101.05d

Criminal penalties.

A person who willfully or recklessly violates this part or a regulation promulgated pursuant to this part shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be subject to a fine not to exceed $25,000 per offense per day, imprisonment not to exceed one year, or both. The fines set forth in this section shall not be limited by §  22-3571.01.

Mar. 15, 1985, D.C. Law 5-165, § 5d
as added Sept. 9, 2014, D.C. Law 20-135, § 101(b), 61 DCR 6767

History